Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8127.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 39-18-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 39-18 entitled "Rhode Island
Public Transit Authority" is hereby amended to read as follows:
39-18-2. Authority created — Composition — Terms — Oath — Officers —
Quorum— Compensation — Conflicts of interest.
(a) There is hereby created a body corporate and politic to be known as the “Rhode Island
public transit authority” (hereinafter “RIPTA”).
(b) The authority shall consist of nine (9) ten (10) members, one of whom shall be the
director of the department of transportation, or the director’s designee, who shall serve as an ex
officio member, and eight (8) nine (9) of whom shall be appointed by the governor with the advice
and consent of the senate, with at least one of the eight (8) nine (9) being a regular user of fixed-
route RIPTA transportation and at least one of the eight (8) nine (9) being a person with a disability.
The governor shall achieve a diverse membership in the board and shall give due consideration to
recommendations for nominations from the RIPTA Riders Alliance, the National Federation of the
Blind of Rhode Island, the Gray Panthers of Rhode Island, the Sierra Club of Rhode Island, the
Rhode Island AFL-CIO, the RIPTA Transportation Advisory Committee, the Rhode Island
business community, the Amalgamated Transit Union, The Rhode Island Climate Community, and
the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns. No one shall be eligible for appointment unless he
or she is a resident of this state.

(c) Those members of the authority as of the effective date of this act [June 16, 2006] who
were appointed to the authority by members of the board of the general assembly shall cease to be
members of the authority on the effective date of this act [June 16, 2006], and the governor shall
thereupon nominate two (2) members, each of whom shall serve the balance of the unexpired term
of their predecessor. Those members of the authority as of the effective date of this act [June 16,
2006] who were appointed to the authority by the governor shall continue to serve the balance of
their current terms. Thereafter, during the month of January in each year, the governor shall appoint
members to succeed the departing members. The newly appointed members shall serve for a term
of three (3) years, commencing on the day they are qualified. In the event of a vacancy occurring
in the membership, the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a member
for the unexpired term. Any member of the authority shall be eligible for reappointment.
(d) Each member of the authority, before entering upon the member’s duties, shall take an
oath to administer the duties of the member’s office faithfully and impartially, and the oath shall
be filed in the office of the secretary of state.
(e) The director of the department of transportation shall serve authority shall elect one of
its members as chairperson. The authority shall elect a secretary and such other officers as it deems
necessary.
(f) Five (5) Six (6) members of the authority shall constitute a quorum. The affirmative
vote of a majority of the members present and voting shall be necessary for any action taken by the
authority. No vacancy in the membership of the authority shall impair the right of a quorum to
exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority.
(g) The members of the authority shall receive no compensation, but shall be reimbursed
for their actual expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of their duties.
(h) No member of the authority shall be in the employ of, or own any stock in, or be in any
way directly or indirectly pecuniarily interested in any railroad corporation, bus, or street railway
company; nor shall any member of the authority personally, or through a partner or agent, render
any professional service or make or perform any business contract with or for any company; nor
shall any member of the authority, directly or indirectly, receive a commission, bonus, discount,
present, or reward from any company.
(i) Members of the authority shall be removable by the governor pursuant to the provisions
of § 36-1-7 and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to
capacity or fitness for the office shall be unlawful.
(j) The authority shall conduct a training course for newly appointed and qualified members
within six (6) months of their qualification or designation. The course shall be developed by the
LC005433 - Page 2 of 4

general manager of the authority, be approved by the authority, and be conducted by the general
manager of the authority. The authority may approve the use of any authority and/or staff members
and/or individuals to assist with training. The training course shall include instruction in the
following areas: the provisions of chapter 46 of title 42, chapter 14 of title 36, and chapter 2 of title
38; and the authority’s rules and regulations. The director of the department of administration shall
be responsible for the enforcement of the provisions of this subsection.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
========
LC005433
========
LC005433 - Page 3 of 4